Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,245.02
Food handling activity, defined.

Food handling activity shall mean food service, food catering, conducting retail food sales, or operating a commissary, mobile food unit, food pushcart, or food vending machine.

Laws 2024, LB262, § 32.
July 19, 2024